Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-384
Sections, how construed.

In the event of an inconsistency between the provisions of sections 8-356 to 8-384 and the provisions of Chapter 8, article 3, such other provisions shall, to the extent of the inconsistency, be construed to be applicable to mutual associations only and not to the capital stock association.

Laws 1981, LB 500, § 29.